Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB226.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 196.173 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Certified professional midwifery services" has the same meaning as in
KRS 314.400; and
(b) "Doula services" means services provided by a trained doula who provides
physical, emotional, and educational support, but not medical care, to
mothers before, during, and after childbirth. Doula services include but are
not limited to:
1. Support and assistance during labor and childbirth;
2. Prenatal and postpartum education;
3. Breastfeeding assistance;
4. Parenting education; and
5. Support in the event that a woman has been or will become separated
from her child.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3)[(2)] of this section, an inmate housed in a jail,
penitentiary, or local or state correctional or detention facility, residential center, or
reentry center who is known to be pregnant shall be restrained solely with
handcuffs in front of her body unless further restraint is required to protect herself
or others.
(3)[(2)] (a) Except in an extraordinary circumstance, no inmate who is known to be
pregnant shall be restrained during labor, during transport to a medical facility
or birthing center for delivery, or during postpartum recovery.
(b) As used in this subsection, "extraordinary circumstance" means that
reasonable grounds exist to believe the inmate presents an immediate and
credible:
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/12/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1586
1. Serious threat of hurting herself, staff, or others; or
2. Risk of escape that cannot be reasonably minimized through any method
other than restraints.
(4) (a) An inmate housed in a jail, penitentiary, or local or state correctional or
detention facility, residential center, or reentry center who is known to be
pregnant or who has given birth in the last six (6) weeks shall be provided
reasonable accommodations for the provision of available certified
professional midwifery services or doula services.
(b) Persons providing certified professional midwifery services or doula services
shall be:
1. Granted appropriate facility access;
2. Allowed to attend and provide assistance during labor and childbirth
where feasible; and
3. Granted access to the inmate's relevant health care information if the
inmate authorizes disclosure.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/12/2025 11:05 AM Jacketed